New York, session 2025-2026, A4265.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 168-f of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 67 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. Any sex offender shall register with the division no later than 5 [ten] three calendar days after any change of address, internet accounts 6 with internet access providers belonging to such offender, internet 7 identifiers that such offender uses, or [his or her] their status of 8 enrollment, attendance, employment or residence at any institution of 9 higher education. A fee of ten dollars, as authorized by subdivision 10 eight of section one hundred sixty-eight-b of this article, shall be 11 submitted by the sex offender each time such offender registers any 12 change of address or any change of [his or her] their status of enroll- 13 ment, attendance, employment or residence at any institution of higher 14 education. Any failure or omission to submit the required fee shall not 15 affect the acceptance by the division of the change of address or change 16 of status. Local law enforcement shall submit all change of address and 17 internet access provider forms to the registry. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05566-01-5